Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1363.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2702.2. Assault of emergency responder.(a) Offense defined.--(1) A person commits a felony of the second degree if the person intentionally or knowingly causes or attempts to cause an emergency responder, while in the performance of duty and with knowledge that the victim is an emergency responder, to come into contact with fentanyl or fentanyl derivatives, including fentanyl or fentanyl derivative salts, isomers and salts of isomers, by throwing, tossing or expelling that substance at the emergency responder.(2) A person commits a felony of the third degree if the 123456789101112131415161718 person causes an emergency responder, while in the performance of duty, to intentionally or knowingly come into contact with fentanyl or fentanyl derivatives, including fentanyl or fentanyl derivative salts, isomers and salts of isomers, while in unlawful possession of that substance in violation of section 13(a) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "emergency responder" shall have the same meaning as the term is given in 35 Pa.C.S. § 75A01 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1363PN1558 - 2 - 123456789101112